Czech.foma
read lexc Czech.lexc
define Lexicon;
define Voiceless [p|t|k|f];
define Voiced [b|d|g|v];
define Nasal [m|n];
define Liquid [r|l];
define Resonant [Nasal|Liquid];
define C [Voiceless|Voiced|Resonant];
define Lengthening a -> á || _ C+ {-j-};
define Iotation {t-j} -> c;
define Voicing s -> z || [.#.|"-"] _ "-" [Voiced | Resonant];
define Insertion s -> {se} || [.#.|"-"] _ "-" s;
define Shortening á -> a || _ C+ {-b-};
define Morphonology Lengthening .o. Iotation .o. Voicing .o. Insertion .o. Shortening;
define RemoveBoundaries "-" -> 0;
define Czech [Lexicon .o. Morphonology].l .o. RemoveBoundaries;
